Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 4. Rights and Duties of Officers and Enlisted Personnel

§ 19-9-401.
National Guard members granted certain exemptions.

Members of the Wyoming national guard are exempt from:

Labor on the public highways;

Service as jurors;

Garnishment or attachment of monies accruing from performance of military duty under orders of the governor.

Every commissioned officer, warrant officer and enlisted man while engaged in active state service has all powers and immunities of other peace officers.

No member of the Wyoming national guard in active state service shall incur any personal liability, civil or criminal, by reason of acts committed in the performance of his necessary duties incident to service under orders of the governor or any lawful superior if the acts are not palpably illegal, excessively violent or malicious. If any civil action is brought against a member by reason of an act or acts committed in the performance of his necessary duties, he is entitled to legal counsel to assist in his defense at state expense. Legal counsel for such purposes may be chosen by the guardsman subject to approval by the Wyoming attorney general and legal fees incurred shall be approved by either:

The Wyoming attorney general if the case does not result in litigation; or

By the district judge before whom the case is tried.

Any member of the Wyoming national guard who possesses a license or credentials to practice a trade or profession in another jurisdiction, or who meets the requirements of the Wyoming national guard for the practice of any professional, mechanical, teaching, training or other skill, may perform that practice, skill, trade or profession without first being licensed or otherwise possessing credentials under any Wyoming licensure laws during those times that he is serving in the Wyoming national guard in a state active service status.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 163, §§ 14, 23; R.S. 1931, §§ 73-114, 73-123; C.S. 1945, §§ 30-115, 30-125; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-47, 19-68, 19-78.26, 19-78.27; Laws 1969, ch. 72, §§ 26, 27; 1971, ch. 187, § 1; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-501

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4; 2011, ch. 94, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

added (d).

Laws 2011, ch. 94, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Official immunity of state national guard members, 52 ALR4th 1095.

§ 19-9-402.
Malpractice liability for professionals serving with the Wyoming national guard.

The state shall defend, hold harmless and indemnify any attorney or doctor of medicine serving as a member of the Wyoming national guard from any financial loss arising out of any claim, demand, suit or judgment in any court by reason of any alleged malpractice of the professional, if the professional was acting in the discharge of his duties at the time that the alleged malpractice was committed, regardless of the actual military status of the professional when the act is alleged to have occurred.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1.

§ 19-9-403.
Pay and allowances of officers and enlisted men in active state service and state active duty; worker's compensation coverage for national guard members; no pension denied by reason of service.

Officers and enlisted men while in active state service shall receive the same pay and allowances as are paid for the same rank and grade for service in the armed forces of the United States. The adjutant general may pay or reimburse reasonable medical expenses incurred by an officer or enlisted man as a direct consequence of state active duty. Medical expenses paid or reasonably eligible for payment by any third party on behalf of the officer or enlisted man shall not be eligible for payment or reimbursement. The adjutant general shall determine, pursuant to rules and regulations adopted under this subsection, whether medical expenses incurred by an officer or enlisted man are the consequence of state active duty.

Members of the Wyoming national guard while in state active duty by order or voluntarily at the request of the governor shall be deemed state employees for purpose of being covered under the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act and their state active duty shall be considered as an extrahazardous occupation under W.S.

27-14-108

.

No member of the national guard shall be denied or deprived of any pension, bounty, gratuity or hospitalization to which he is now entitled under the laws of Wyoming because of service therein.

The state shall pay the matriculation fees and tuition in any university, junior college or vocational training institution in Wyoming for the children and spouse of any member of the Wyoming national guard who dies or sustains a permanent total disability resulting from duty as a guardsman while on state active duty or any authorized training duty.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 72, § 28; 1971, ch. 62, § 1; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-502

; 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2003, ch. 19, § 1; 2010, ch. 95, § 1; 2013 ch. 131, § 1, effective March 13, 2013.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added the second through fourth sentences of (a).

The 2013 amendment,

in (a), substituted “The adjutant general may pay or reimburse reasonable medical expenses incurred by an” for “While serving in state active duty, officers and enlisted men are entitled to receive reimbursement for reasonable medical expenses paid by the” in the second sentence, added “or reasonably eligible for payment,” “payment or” and made a stylistic change in the third sentence.

Laws 2013, ch. 131, § 2, made the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2013.

Salaries. —

Compiled Statutes 1920, §§ 386, 387, specifying salaries of officers and enlisted men of national guard during encampments, did not provide a continuing appropriation, it being contemplated that each legislature should appropriate sufficient to meet the obligation. State ex rel. Davis v. Carter, 31 Wyo. 401, 226 P. 690,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1924).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of state statutes requiring employers to compensate employees for absences occasioned by military service, 8 ALR4th 704.

§ 19-9-404.
Complaints of wrongs; Uniform Code of Military Justice Article 138-similar procedure.

Any member of the Wyoming national guard who believes the member has been wronged by a commanding officer, and who, upon due application to that commanding officer, is refused redress may complain to any superior commissioned officer. The superior commissioned officer shall forward the complaint to the adjutant general. The adjutant general shall examine the complaint and take proper measures for redressing the wrong complained of and shall, as soon as possible, send to the appropriate governor a true statement of that complaint, with the measures taken to redress the complaint. The provisions of this section may be exercised in addition to or in lieu of the applicable procedures in W.S. 19-7-103(b)(xxv).

History.

2022 ch. 86, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2022, ch, 86, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2022.